District of Columbia statutes.
16-4605.01

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-378, § 2(c), (e), 56 DCR 1572

History

2001 Ed., § 16-4604.01.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 17-378 amended the section by redesignating this section.

Effect of Amendments

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 401 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).

Editor's Notes